Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5980.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3157. (1) Subject to subsections (2) to (14), (16), a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person that lawfully renders treatment to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury covered by personal protection insurance, or a person that provides rehabilitative occupational training following the injury, may charge a reasonable amount for the treatment or training. The charge must not exceed the amount the person customarily charges for like treatment or training in cases that do not involve insurance. (2) Subject to subsections (3) to (14), (16), a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person that renders treatment or rehabilitative occupational training to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury covered by personal protection insurance is not eligible for payment or reimbursement under this chapter for more than the following: (a) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2021 and before July 2, 2022, 200% of the amount payable to the person for the treatment or training under Medicare. (b) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2022 and before July 2, 2023, 195% of the amount payable to the person for the treatment or training under Medicare. (c) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2023, 190% of the amount payable to the person for the treatment or training under Medicare. (3) Subject to subsections (5) to (14), (16), a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person identified in subsection (4) that renders treatment or rehabilitative occupational training to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury covered by personal protection insurance is eligible for payment or reimbursement under this chapter of not more than the following: (a) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2021 and before July 2, 2022, 230% of the amount payable to the person for the treatment or training under Medicare. (b) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2022 and before July 2, 2023, 225% of the amount payable to the person for the treatment or training under Medicare. (c) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2023, 220% of the amount payable to the person for the treatment or training under Medicare. (4) Subject to subsection (5), subsection (3) only applies to a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person if either of the following applies to the person rendering the treatment or training: (a) On July 1 of the year in which the person renders the treatment or training, the person has 20% or more, but less than 30%, indigent volume determined pursuant to the methodology used by the department of health and human services in determining inpatient medical/surgical factors used in measuring eligibility for Medicaid disproportionate share payments. (b) The person is a freestanding rehabilitation facility. Each year the director shall designate not more than 2 freestanding rehabilitation facilities to qualify for payments under subsection (3) for that year. As used in this subdivision, "freestanding rehabilitation facility" means an acute care hospital to which all of the following apply: (i) The hospital has staff with specialized and demonstrated rehabilitation medicine expertise. (ii) The hospital possesses sophisticated technology and specialized facilities. (iii) The hospital participates in rehabilitation research and clinical education. (iv) The hospital assists patients to achieve excellent rehabilitation outcomes. (v) The hospital coordinates necessary post-discharge services. (vi) The hospital is accredited by 1 or more third-party, independent organizations focused on quality. (vii) The hospital serves the rehabilitation needs of catastrophically injured patients in this state. (viii) The hospital was in existence on May 1, 2019. (5) To qualify for a payment under subsection (4)(a), a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person shall provide the director with all documents and information requested by the director that the director determines are necessary to allow the director to determine whether the person qualifies. The director shall annually review documents and information provided under this subsection and, if the person qualifies under subsection (4)(a), shall certify the person as qualifying and provide a list of qualifying persons to insurers and other persons that provide the security required under section 3101(1). 3101. A physician, hospital, clinic, or other person that provides 30% or more of its total treatment or training as described under subsection (4)(a) is entitled to receive, instead of an applicable percentage under subsection (3), 250% of the amount payable to the person for the treatment or training under Medicare. (6) Subject to subsections (7) to (14), (16), a hospital that is a level I or level II trauma center that renders treatment to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury covered by personal protection insurance, if the treatment is for an emergency medical condition and rendered before the patient is stabilized and transferred, is not eligible for payment or reimbursement under this chapter of more than the following: (a) For treatment rendered after July 1, 2021 and before July 2, 2022, 240% of the amount payable to the hospital for the treatment under Medicare. (b) For treatment rendered after July 1, 2022 and before July 2, 2023, 235% of the amount payable to the hospital for the treatment under Medicare. (c) For treatment rendered after July 1, 2023, 230% of the amount payable to the hospital for the treatment under Medicare. (7) If Except as for treatment covered under subsection (9), (10), or (11), if Medicare does not provide an amount payable for a treatment or rehabilitative occupational training under subsection (2), (3), (5), or (6), the physician, hospital, clinic, or other person that renders the treatment or training to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury covered by personal protection insurance is not eligible for payment or reimbursement under this chapter of more than the following, as applicable: (a) For a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person to which subsection (2) applies, the applicable following percentage of the amount payable for the treatment or training under the person's charge description master in effect on January 1, 2019 or, if the person did not have a charge description master on that date, the applicable following percentage of the average amount the person charged for the treatment on January 1, 2019: (i) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2021 and before July 2, 2022, 55%. (ii) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2022 and before July 2, 2023, 54%. (iii) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2023, 52.5%. (b) For a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person to which subsection (3) applies, the applicable following percentage of the amount payable for the treatment or training under the person's charge description master in effect on January 1, 2019 or, if the person did not have a charge description master on that date, the applicable following percentage of the average amount the person charged for the treatment or training on January 1, 2019: (i) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2021 and before July 2, 2022, 70%. (ii) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2022 and before July 2, 2023, 68%. (iii) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2023, 66.5%. (c) For a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person to which subsection (5) applies, 78% of the amount payable for the treatment or training under the person's charge description master in effect on January 1, 2019 or, if the person did not have a charge description master on that date, 78% of the average amount the person charged for the treatment on January 1, 2019. (d) For a physician, hospital, clinic, or other person to which subsection (6) applies, the applicable following percentage of the amount payable for the treatment under the person's charge description master in effect on January 1, 2019 or, if the person did not have a charge description master on that date, the applicable following percentage of the average amount the person charged for the treatment on January 1, 2019: (i) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2021 and before July 2, 2022, 75%. (ii) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2022 and before July 2, 2023, 73%. (iii) For treatment or training rendered after July 1, 2023, 71%. (8) For any change to an amount payable under Medicare as provided in subsection (2), (3), (5), or (6) that occurs after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, June 11, 2019, the change must be applied to the amount allowed for payment or reimbursement under that subsection. However, an amount allowed for payment or reimbursement under subsection (2), (3), (5), or (6) must not exceed the average amount charged by the physician, hospital, clinic, or other person for the treatment or training on January 1, 2019. (9) An amount that is to be applied under subsection (7) or (8), that was in effect on January 1, 2019, including any prior adjustments to the amount made under this subsection, must be adjusted annually by the percentage change in the medical care component of the Consumer Price Index for the year preceding the adjustment.Residential services provided to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury covered by personal protection insurance must be reimbursed as follows: (a) For residential services minimum assist level, $455.00 per day billed using code T2048 with modifier 01. (b) For residential services moderate assist level, $569.00 per day billed using code T2048 with modifier 02. (c) For residential services maximum assist level, $854.00 per day billed using code T2048 with modifier 03. (d) For residential services bed hold, billed using code T2048 with modifier 04, as follows: (i) For the first 2 consecutive days of any leave of absence, the applicable residential services level rate under subdivision (a), (b), or (c). (ii) For any consecutive day or days of leave after the first 2 days, 55% of the per day rate in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) for the applicable level of care. (10) For attendant care rendered in the injured person's home, to a person with only musculoskeletal injuries that do not involve fractured bones, vertebral disc injuries, torn ligaments, spinal cord injuries, amputation, severe burns, or a traumatic brain injury, an insurer is only required to pay allowable expense benefits for attendant care up to the hourly limitation in section 315 of the worker's disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.315. This subsection only applies if the attendant care is provided by a personal caregiver. directly, or indirectly through another person, by any of the following: (a) An individual who is related to the injured person. (b) An individual who is domiciled in the household of the injured person. (c) An individual with whom the injured person had a business or social relationship before the injury. (11) An insurer may contract to pay benefits for attendant care for more than the hourly limitation under subsection (10).Personal caregivers providing service to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury that occurred after June 10, 2019 and that is covered by personal protection insurance must be reimbursed as follows: (a) For basic care level services billed using code G0156, 60% of the amount payable under the Department of Veterans Affairs' fee schedule as of January 1, 2026, for rest of state. (b) For high-tech care level services billed using code G0156, 65% of the amount payable under the Department of Veterans Affairs' fee schedule as of January 1, 2026, for rest of state. (c) For a registered nurse providing nursing services billed using code G156, 60% of the applicable amount under the Department of Veterans Affairs' fee schedule as of January 1, 2026, for rest of state. (d) For a licensed practical nurse providing nursing services billed using code G156, 60% of the applicable amount under the Department of Veterans Affairs' fee scheduled as of January 1, 2026, for rest of state. (12) Beginning January 1, 2027, the amount applied under subsection (7), (9), or (11) that was in effect on January 1, 2019, including any prior adjustments to the amount made under this subsection, must be adjusted annually by the percentage change in the medical care component of the Consumer Price Index for the year preceding the adjustment. (13) Reimbursement must be issued in accordance with section 3107(1)(a) for all treatment or training provided to an injured person for an accidental bodily injury that occurred after June 10, 2019 and that is covered by personal protection insurance for the following types of treatment: (a) Services related to guardianship or conservatorship. (b) Vehicle modifications. (c) Home modifications. (d) Computer equipment and supplies. (e) Generators. (f) Nonemergency medical transportation. (g) Nonprescription drugs and over-the-counter medical supplies. (h) Case management services that are not otherwise payable under Medicare. (14) (12) A neurological rehabilitation clinic provider that renders home care or residential services, or both, is not entitled to payment or reimbursement for a treatment , or training , product, service, or accommodation under this section unless the neurological rehabilitation clinic provider is accredited by the Joint Commission, or JTC, the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities, or CARF, the Community Health Accreditation Partner, or CHAP, the Accreditation Commission for Health Care, or ACHC, or a similar organization recognized by the director for purposes of accreditation under this subsection. This subsection does not apply to a neurological rehabilitation clinic provider that is in or begins the process of becoming accredited as required under this subsection on July 1, 2021, verified by the accrediting body, not more than 1 year after the effective date of the 2026 amendatory act that amended this sentence, unless 3 years have passed since the beginning of that process effective date of the 2026 amendatory act that amended this sentence and the neurological rehabilitation clinic provider is still not accredited. The accreditation requirement under this subsection does not apply to a personal caregiver. (15) (13) Subsections (2) to (12) (13) do not apply to emergency medical services rendered by an ambulance operation. As used in this subsection: (a) "Ambulance operation" means that term as defined in section 20902 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20902. (b) "Emergency medical services" means that term as defined in section 20904 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20904. (14) Subsections (2) to (13) apply to treatment or rehabilitative occupational training rendered after July 1, 2021. (16) Nothing in this section must be construed as affecting the rights of a person who sustained accidental bodily injury prior to June 11, 2019. (17) (15) As used in this section: (a) "Amputation" means the removal, by surgical or traumatic means, of all or part of a hand, arm, foot, or leg. (b) "BADLs" means basic activities of daily living and may include bathing, dressing, grooming, toileting, personal hygiene, feeding, and other basic self-care activities. (c) "Basic care level services" means services generally performed at the care level of a home health aide or certified nursing assistant for the purpose of providing personal care or assisting an injured person with the performance of BADLs or IADLs in the home or other place of residence. (d) (a) "Charge description master" means a uniform schedule of charges represented by the person as its gross billed charge for a given service or item, regardless of payer type. (e) (b) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for this state from the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. (f) (c) "Emergency medical condition" means that term as defined in section 1395dd of the social security act, 42 USC 1395dd. (g) "High-tech care level services" means services generally performed at the care level of a home health aide or certified nursing assistant for the purpose of providing personal care, assisting with the performance of BADLs and IADLs, and providing additional interventions for an injured person, including, but not limited to, basic bowel and bladder program management, complex transfers, basic behavior and cognitive management, vital sign monitoring, orthopedic brace care, basic skin integrity care, pediatric patient care, and other forms of monitoring and care that do not require direct care or oversight by a licensed nurse, in the home or other place of residence. (h) "Home care" means home health aide, nursing, and skilled therapy services provided to an injured person in the home or place of residence, other than in a hospital, nursing home, or county medical facility, unless ordered by a physician for safety reasons. (i) "IADLs" means instrumental activities of daily living and may include health and medication management, money and financial management, menu planning, grocery shopping, cooking, cleaning, laundry, transportation, community mobility or access, planning and organization, and other similar activities. (j) (d) "Level I or level II trauma center" means a hospital that is verified as a level I or level II trauma center by the American College of Surgeons Committee on Trauma. (k) (e) "Medicaid" means a program for medical assistance established under subchapter XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-5.1396w-9. (l) (f) "Medicare" means fee for service payments under part A, B, or D of the federal Medicare program established under subchapter XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395lll, 1395mmm, without regard to the limitations unrelated to the rates in the fee schedule such as limitation or supplemental payments related to utilization, readmissions, recaptures, bad debt adjustments, or sequestration. (g) "Neurological rehabilitation clinic" means a person that provides post-acute brain and spinal rehabilitation care. (m) (h) "Person", as provided in section 114, includes, but is not limited to, an institution. (n) "Personal caregiver" means an individual who provides services under subsection (10) or (11), or both, and who is 1 or more of the following: (i) An individual who is related to the injured person. (ii) An individual who is domiciled in the household of the injured person. (iii) An individual with whom the injured person had a business or social relationship before the injury. (iv) An individual who is employed or contracted to perform home care services directly by an injured person or the injured person's legal representative. (v) An individual who is not employed or contracted to perform home care services by any agency or other organization. (vi) An individual who renders home care services to no more than 2 injured persons at the same time. (o) "Residential services" means postacute brain or spinal cord rehabilitation treatment or training rendered in an accredited residential program that may include direct assistance with BADLs or IADLs on a continual or intermittent basis, direct supervision for health and safety, and medical or behavioral oversight or intervention. Residential services do not include 1-on-1 staffing or supervision beyond program-level supervision, nursing treatment or intervention, medical supplies, durable medical equipment, individualized interventions and therapeutic services, individual or group therapy services, vocational services and supports, day programs, or transportation to appointments or activities not sponsored by the program. (p) "Residential services bed hold" means a temporary leave of absence for an injured person from the accredited residential program in which the injured person permanently resides. (q) "Residential services level 1" means residential services provided to an injured person who generally requires 1 or more of the following: (i) Minimal assistance on a routine basis to perform at least some BADLs. (ii) Minimal to moderate assistance to perform at least some ADLs. (iii) Ongoing supervision in a structured living environment. (iv) Minimal assistance on a routine basis to manage 1 or more medical conditions. (v) Intermittent support to manage mood or promote behavioral stability. (r) "Residential services level 2" means residential services provided to an injured person who may require any service listed in subdivision (q) and who generally requires 1 or more of the following: (i) Minimal to moderate assistance or supervision to perform most BADLs. (ii) Minimal to moderate assistance or supervision for functional mobility. (iii) Moderate to maximum assistance to perform most IADLs. (iv) Direct care on a routine basis to monitor and manage 1 or more medical conditions. (v) One or more impromptu specialized interventions to address behavioral concerns, including mild to moderate verbal aggression. (s) "Residential services level 3" means residential services provided to an injured person who may require any service identified in subdivision (q) or (r) and who generally requires 1 or more of the following: (i) Maximum to total assistance to perform most BADLs. (ii) Maximum to total assistance for functional mobility. (iii) Moderate to maximum assistance to perform most IADLs. (iv) Daily direct care or oversight, or both, by a licensed health care professional to manage 1 or more medical conditions. (v) One or more impromptu specialized interventions or individualized behavioral plans for consistent therapeutic response to address behavioral or mental health concerns, including verbal or physical aggression. (t) "Rest of state" means that term as used in the locality key on the Department of Veterans Affairs' fee schedule. (u) (i) "Stabilized" means that term as defined in section 1395dd of the social security act, 42 USC 1395dd. (v) (j) "Transfer" means that term as defined in section 1395dd of the social security act, 42 USC 1395dd. (w) (k) "Treatment" includes, but is not limited to, products, services, and accommodations. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05917'25) or House Bill No. 5981 (request no. H05917'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.